ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/de_DE/1901/hyph_de_DE.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
ac7k/k=,2,1
c2k
c7ka/k=,1,1
ec7k/k=,2,1
c7ke/k=,1,1
ic7k/k=,2,1
c7ki/k=,1,1
oc7k/k=,2,1
c7ko/k=,1,1
uc7k/k=,2,1
c7ku/k=,1,1
äc7k/k=,2,1
c7kä/k=,1,1
öc7k/k=,2,1
c7kö/k=,1,1
üc7k/k=,2,1
c7kü/k=,1,1
.b2
.ballet7tänzer/tt=,6,1
.1ba
.bal1le
.ballet1tä
.ballettän1ze
1schi
schif7fah2rt/ff=,5,1
sch2if
schif1fa
.hel7lic2ht/ll=,3,1
.hel1li
.hel2lic
.k2
.kam7macher/mm=,3,1
.1ka
.kam1ma
.kamma1che
.r2
.rol7laden/ll=,3,1
.rol1la
.rolla1de
.s2
.st2
.stam7mutter/mm=,4,1
.1stam
.stam1mu
.stamm2ut
.stammut1te
.stil7legung/ll=,4,1
.1sti
.stil1le
.stille1gu
.stil7leben/ll=,4,1
.stille1be
.a2
.aa1
.ar2s
.a2n1s
.a1n1e
.an1gr
.an3k
.an2to
.ae1
.a1b1a
.a1b1i
.ab1l
.a1b1u
.a1li1
.au2s1
.au1th
.a2ut
.au2f1
.rü1b
.o2
.or1c
.or2t2r2
.o2rt
.os2
.ob1r
.o4ma
.na2c
.na1b
.1ni1s
.i2
.in1
.ide3e2n
.i1de
.i2dee2
.si1g
.1si
.sch2
.sym3
.cre2me
.1cr
.cr2em
.ha2u2t
.he2r
.e2
.er1ob
.e1r1i
.2er1e
.er3b2l
.er1b
.er1k
.en2dr2
.en2d3er
.en1de
.en2t
.ent3ei
.en1te
.e1s1te
.be1ra
.ber2n
.be3ne
.bü4ro.
.1bü
.bü1ro
.bü1s
.ä2
.äs1
.äch1
.d2
.da2r
.d4sc
.2ds
.de1l
.1de
.u2
.un3sc
.u2ns
.u1n1e
.ul1
.um1
.g2
.ge3ne
.1ge
.geb2
.ge1bl
.ü2
.ko1o
.1ko
.kni3en
.kni2
.t2
.ta1b
.m2
.mi2t
.1mi
.vol2
.1v
.wo2r
.we2g3r
.1weg
.p2
.zi2e
.1zi
.zi3g
.ö2
aa1ru
aa1c
a1a2b
aat2s1
a1ras
a1rad
ar1all
ar1au
a1rag
a1rat
a1ro
a2r1o1d
2a1ri
ar1inn
ari1es
ar2s2ch2m
ar1sc
1ar1c
a1re
a3ree
a3ret
a3rep
ar2b3s
ar1b
a1rä
ar2g1l
ar1g
ar1ü
art1he
a2rt
ar1tu
ao1i
a1o2te
1anru
an1r
an1or
an3ne
a1ni
a2n1is1l
a1nis
1a1nim
an1sh
a2ns
ans2k
an1s1kr
an1st
an1s1z
an1c
a2nek
a1ne
an1em
an1äs
an1dac
and1re
andr2
and1rü
andi3nn
an1di
and2sa
an2ds
an2d3eng
an1de
ande2s1
1an1l
a1nu
an2g1ar
an1ga
an1gli
1an1ka
an2kr
1an1kä
1an1tr2
an1tho
1ant1w
anz1w
1an1fa
a1nö
ai1ro
ai2sc
ai1e
a1i2g
ai2v
a1ive
a1sa
ase2n
a1se
a1su
ast1au
as1p2
a1sy
ach1au
ach1ra
achr2
a1chro
ach1re
a2ch1n2
a1chi
a1che
ach3er1w
ach1ei
achem1
a2ch1l
a1chu
a2ch3m
ach1w
ah1au
ah1re
ahre2n2s
ah1ren
ah1os
ah1nu
a1hi
a1he
ah1li
ah1le
a1e2ls
ab1ris
ab1re
ab1ru
a1b1rü
ab1ir
a1bi
1a2b1s
1ab1h
1ab1ä
1a2b1d
ab1la
ab1lä
ab1lö
1a2b1k2
1ab1m
1ab1v
3a2b1w
1ab1z
1a2b1f
ad1ap
ad1op
adi1s
a1di
ade1a
a1de
al1ar1b
al1ang
1a2lab
al1a2bt
al1a2ut
al1auf
a1l1ak
al1am
a1lo
a1li
a3lis
ali2e1ne
ali1en
al1st2
a2ls
al2stü
a2l1c
al1er1b
a1ler
a2lei
a2l1el
a3lek
1a1l1ef
a1lä
al1gr
alk1s
a2lk
al1tra
altr2
al1to
a1ly
au1a
au1r
au1i
au2sa
2au1so
2ausc
aus1ta
aus1t2r2
au2sti
2auc
2aue
au1er
au2e1re
au1em
2aub
aub1l
au1ku
2aum
au2fa
au2fo
1auf1n
2aufbe
auf1b
ag1ar
a1ga
ag1an
aga2b
a2g1au
ag2n
agi3er.
a1gi
a3ge2n.
a1ge
a2gent
ag3es1se
age2s1s2
age2sp2
a2gem
ag1l
a1gy
a1ki1
a1ke
a2kes
ak1t1an
akt1h
ak3te
1ak1z
a1ta
at1ar
a1tr2
a1to
a2t1o2rt
2a1ti
at1int
at2c
at1hil
a1te
ateno1
at1eig
a2teb
a1tu
a1tü
at1tr2
att1s
atz1w
ama3g
a1ma
a1mo2
am2ta
amt1h
am2pl
2a1v
a3ve
av2e3re2
ave2r1
a1w
awi1
a1pa
a1pi
api1en
a1ph2
a1pe
ap2fa
a1z
a2fa
a3far
af1an
af1re
af2tau
af1ta
ay1
a2q
a1xi
a1xe
1rar.
2r1ar1b
r1a2rt
r1arm
r1arz
1rao
r1an1r
rans1p2
ra2ns
r1an1b
r1an1w
r1anf
2ra1ha
r1ahn
ra1e2l.
ra1be
rab2br
rab1b
rab1l
ra1da
rali1e
ra1li
ra1le
2ralt
1ral1w
1ralf
1ra1ly
3r2aufbe
rauf1b
ra1gr
rags2p2r
ra2gs
rags1p2
1ra1kl
ra1ku
rat1sc
ra1p2r
1ra1z
r1ra
rr1aus
r1ro
r2r1ob
r1ri
rr1c
r1re
r1rä
r1ru
r1rü
rrü1b
rr1tu
r2rt
r1rö
r1r2y
ro1ar
roa2
ro1ri
ro3re
r2on
1ronn
ro2n1s
ro1i
ro1sk
ro1sp2
ro1ch
ro1ben
ro1bl
ro2di
ro1d
3rou
ro2ta
ro1pe
roy1
r1na
r2n1ab
r2n1au
r1no
rn1ost
r1ni
rn1sp2
r2ns
rn1c
r2ners
r1ne
r3nei
r1nä
r1nu
r1nü
rn3ta
ri1a2le
ri1at
2r1ir
ri1o2se
ri1o1te
r3inner
rin3ne
2rind
1rih
ri1ern
ri1en
ri1el
r2ig
ri1ki
r2it
ri1ta
ri2ve
ri1v
ri1ph2
r1sa
rs3achs
r1sac
r1so
r3si
r1sc
rsch2r2
r3sche
r2s1emp
r1se
rs1ep
rs2lo
rs1l
r1su
r1sü
r1stal
r1staf
r1st2r2
r3stu
r1s2p2
r1sy
r1ca
rch1ar
rch1au
rchi3en
r1chen
rch1ei
r2ch1l
rch1tu
rc2ht
r2ch3m
r1h
r2ha2ns
1r2hy
1r2e.
1rer
2r1er1nä
r3erst
r2e1re
2rer1l
4rerk
r1er1ka
r1er1ke
r1erkl
2r1erz
2r1erf
1reo
re1or
1ren
3rena
r2e1ni
r1ent1s
2r3ent1w
r1ein1r
2reig
1re2s.
res1a
2re1sc
1re1su
1rest
3rechts
rec2ht
re1el
re1le
r1eur
1reg
re1go
3rekon
re1ko
r2em
1re2m.
re2w
re1po
3re1z
3re1fe
3re1fl
r1b
rb2r
rb4st
r2bs
rb3ste
r2bli
r3blie
3r2ä2n.
3r2ä1ni1
rächs1
1räl
1rät
r1da
r1dr2
rd1ran
r3dri
r1do
rd3er1ge
r1de
rder1g
r1dä
r2d1t
r1l
r2l2s1
r2l1c
ru1ar
r1ur
2r1u2n1s
run2d3er
run1de
2runt
ru1is
ru1st2r2
ru1ta
r2ut
rut1h
2rum
1ruf
ruf2s
r1g
r2g1ar1b
r1ga
rg2ab
r2g1au
rg2r
r2g1no
rg1sk
r2gs
rg2s1p2
rg1lo
rü1ben
rübe2
r1k2n
r1ki
rk1sh
rk1st2r2
r1ke
r1kla
rk1lic
r1ku
2rt
r1ta
r2t1ar
r1t2r2
r1to
r1ti
r2ts
rt1sc
rt1su
rt1st2r2
rt1hol
rt1hi
rt1hei
r1te
rte1a
rter2r
rt1eig
r1tä
2rt1u2rt
r1tum
r1tü
rt1t
rt1z
r1tö
rm1ana
r1ma
r3mac
r3mak
r2m1ap
rm1sp2
r1mä
r1mü
r1w
r1wä1s
r1p2
rpi1o2
r2ps
rp3fa
rz1ar
rz1op
r1zo
r2z1in
r1zi
r2z1eng
r1ze
r1zwi
r1fr
r1fl
r2f1lic
r3fu
r1ör
r1ö2f
r2y
r1x
oa2
o1an
o1as
o1a3b
oa3de
o1al
o1au
oa3t
o1ap
o2rah
ora2b
or1au
o1ro1
orin1
o3r2it
or1che
o1re
or1ein
o1rä
ord1am
or1da
or3dr2
1or2d1n
or2gn
or1g
or2gl
or1ü
or2t1an
o2rt
or1ta
ort3ent
or1te
or1tu
or1z
o1r2y
ook1
oo2mo
o1op
o1na
on1ar1b
o3nat
o1no
ono1c
on2na
o1ni
ons1a
o2ns
ons3z
o1nä
o1nu
on1gr
on3f
1ony
oi2n1s
oi2s
o1it
o1sa
o1so
o2s1o1d
os2ste
o2s1s2
o3sen
o1se
o1su2
os2ko
o1sy
1os1q
och1a2
o1che
o2ch1l
o1chu
o2ch3m
och1w
o1ha
oh1re
o1ho
ohn1a
oh1nu
oh1s
o1he
ohl1a
oh1lo
oh1li
oh1le
o1hu
o1er
o1ei
o1e2b
o1el
oe1t
o1e2te
o1ex
ob1ac
o1ba
ob1sa
o2bs
oben1d
o1bel
ob1li
o1bü1
1ob1j
o1d
odes1
o1de
o1la
o1lo
o1li
o1le
ole1ra
o1ler
ol1da
ol2lin
ol1li
ol3ler
ol1le
oll3end
ol2lu
o1lu
ol2p3r
ol1p
our2s
ou1i
o1g
o1ü
o1ki
o1ke
o1kl
o1ku
o1tar.
ot1am
ot1r2
ot2ro
o1to
o1ti
oti2o2n.
o3tio
otion2
ot1sc
o1t2h
o1te
otem1
otemp2
otli2
ot1l
o1tu
ott1r2
ott1h
o2mau
o1ma
o1mä
ova1
o1v
o1wa
o1wo
o1wi
o1we
o1pa
1opa.
op1a2rt
o1p2r
op3ro
o1po
o1pi
opi1en
op1st
o1ph2
o1pä
op2pl
op2f1a
opf1l
o1z
oze1r
o1ze
of1r
of1l
of2fa
off1r
off1s
o2ßi
o2ß1el
o1ße
oß1u2
o1ö
oqui1
o1q
oqu2
o1xo
o1xi
o1xe
2n.
1na.
1naa
2n1ar1c
n1a2rt
2n1a2n.
n1ana
1nann
na2n1s
n1an1d
2n1ang
n1anf
1na2s1s2
na1sc
na1sta
3nah
na1br
na1bel
na1d2
nal1au
na1le
1nau.
1nau1i
1n2aue
n1auf
1nag
1nat
2n1at1m
n1amt
1n2a1v
1naß
n1r
nrö2s1
1no.
1nors
nor1c
n1or1g
n1o2rt
1noi
nos1p2
2noh
1nol
n1oly
1nok
3nom
1no1v
1no1z
1noß
n1na
nn1ar
nn1ab
n1no
n1ni
nn1sa
n2ns
nn2sta
nn1c
nne2s
n1ne
n2ne2s1s2
n1nä
n1nu
nn1g
n1nü
n1nö
n1ny
1ni.
1nia2
ni1a2le
ni1ak
1nio
ni1on2
n1i2n1h
2n1int
n1in3f
1nis
3nisc
ni1st2r2
ni1ern
ni1en
ni1el
ni1eu
1nid
1nig
nig1re
ni2gel
ni1ge
1nik
ni1ta
1nim
1niz
2ns
ns1ar
ns1ang
n2s1ab
ns1alt
ns1aus
ns1au2f
ns1ak
n1so
n1sc
n2s1ers
n1se
ns1er1k
ns1erm
ns1er1w
n2s1ec
nse2kr
n2s1ex
n1sur
ns1un
n1sü
n1st2r2
ns1pä
nsp2
ns2pu
ns2ze
ns1z
n1sy
n1ca
n1che
n2ch3m
n1ce
2n1h
1ne
ne1a2n
n2er.
ne1r2a
ne1ro
n2e1re
n1er1g
2nerz
n1er1zi
2ner1fa
nen1a
nen1st
ne2ns
1ne1ne2
2n1ener
nen1dr2
n1ent1w
2nei
3n2ei.
n1eina
n1ein3f
3neit
2nec
n1eh2r1
2nee
n2e2lo
2nelt
neun3
neu1s
neu3e3r2e.
neu1er
neu2e4re
net1au
ne1ta
net1s
n1emp
n1b
nbe1ra
nbe1s
1näl
nd1ar1b
nd1a2rt
n1dal
n1d1ak
n1dam
nd1rat
ndr2
nd1run
n1dru
nd1o2rt
nd1op
ndi1o
n1di
nd2e1re
n1de
n2d1ei
nde3si
n3dee2
n1dä
nd1urs
n1du
nd1u2m.
n2dum
nd1ta
n2dt
n1l
1nua
nu1ar
nu1an
2n1uni
n1und1
1nung
nun2g2s1
n1unt
1nui
1nus1
nu1s1k
nu1e
1nug
1n2ut
n1um1sc
n1um1g
1nuß
n2g1at
n1ga
n1gra
ng1or
ng1n
ng3sti
n2gs
ngs3tip
n3gen
n1ge
ng1lo
1nü.
1nüs
2n1üb
1nüt
n2kan
n1ka
nk1aus
nk1ak
nk1rä
n1kr
nkol3
n1ko
n2k1op
nk1not
n1ki
nk1i2d
n1ke
n2k1erf
n1kla
n1klo
nk1lic
nk1len
nk1les
nk1lem
n1klu
n1ku
nkt1h
nk1tü
n1ta
n2t1ark
nt1a2rt
n2tauf
n2t1am
n1tr2
n2t1ra.
n3trop
n2trin
nt1ric
nt2re
n2t3rec
n2t1rü
n1to
n3ti
nti1c
nt1s
nts2o
nt1hi
nt1hü
n1te
n3ten
n1tär
n1tät
n1tu
n1tü
nt1t
nt1z
n1tö
n1m
nme2n2s
n1me
n1w
n1p2
npro1
np2r
np3fa
nzi2a
n1zi
nzi2n
nz1i1ni
n1fr
n1fl
n2fu
1nös
nö1c
1nöt
n1öf
i1ar
i1a2n.
i1a2ns
i1ant
i1anz
ia1be
iab1l
i1a2l.
i1alar
i1al1r
i1a2li2e
ia1li
ia3lit
i1a2ls
i1a2l1h
ia2le
i1a2lb
i1ald
i1all
i1alg
i1a2lk
i1alm
i1al1v
i1al1w
i1al1p
i1alf
i1alö
i1au
ia1g
ia2te
1ir2on
i1rol
ir2n1er
ir1ne
i1ri
ir2s
ir1c
i1re
i1rä
irk1l
io1ri
i3o2re2n.
io1re
io1ren
ion2
i1o2n.
i1o2ns1
io2n2e.
io1ne
io1i
io2se
io1c
i1o2d
i1ot.
io2ten
io1te
io1pi1
in1ai
i1nas
in1ab
in1au
in1a2m
in1or
in3ne
2in1ny
i1ni
in1sa
i2ns
ins2k
in1sp2
in1c
i2n1ei
i1ne
i2neh
i2neb
ine2d
i1nä
in3dr2
in2de1ne
in1de
in1gr
ing1le
in1kn
in1th
in3f
i1i2
i1sa
i2s1au
2i3si
i1schr2
is1h
i3se
ise3in3f
i1su
is1k
i1sta
ist3re
ist2r2
is1th
is1po
isp2
is1pe
i1sy
i1ca
i1cho
i1che
i2ch1l
i1chu
ich1tu
ic2ht
i2ch3m
ich1w
ih1ar
i1han
i1hal
ih1r
i1ho
ih1n
i1hi
i1he
ih1l
i1hu
i2h1um
i1hö
ie1a
ie1ro
ie2r1in
ie1ri
i1erc
i2e3re
ie4r1ec
ier1k
i1ena
ie1nab
i1en1r
ien1o
i1enor
i1en2s.
ie2ns
ien2st2r2
i1en1b
i1end
i1enle
ien1l
i1eng
i1en1kr
i1en1m
i1en1v
i1en1w
i1en1p2
i1enz
i1en3f
i1ei
ie2s3che
ie1sc
iesch2
iec7k2/k=,3,1
ie1e
iee2n1
ie2br
ie1le
ie2le2h
i1ell
ie2g3r
i1ett
i1bri
i1be
ibe1ra
i2b1ei
i1bä
ib2lei
iä2
i1är
i1ät.
i1da
id1r2
i1do
id2e1re
i1de
1i1dy
i1la
il1ar
il1a2ns
il1ad
i2lak
i1lo
i1li
il1ind
i2lip1pe
i1le
il1eis
i1lä
i1lu
il2min
il1mi
i1u
iund1
ig1a2rt
i1ga
i1gra
ig1ro
ig1rö
i1g2na
i2g1s
ig1he
ig1l
i3ka1d
i1ka
ik2rä
i1kr
ik1in
i1ke
ik1er1w
i2k1erz
ik1le
ik1lö
i1ku
ik1un
ik1ta
ik1th
ik1t1u
i1k1j
it1ar1b
it1a2rt
it2a2ns
it1a2b.
i2t3au2s.
i1taus
it1auf
it1am
it1rau
itr2
i1tri
it1re
i3t1ren
it1räu
i1tru
i1to
i1ti
i2tia
it2si
it1sc
it2s1e
it1st2r2
it1hi
i1te
ite2n
it1ein
i1tä
i1tu
i3tus
i1tö
im1st
i1mä
i1mü
imt1h
i2vr
i1v
i3vi
i1w
i1pa
i1po
i1pi
ipi1en
i1pe
i2p1le
i1pl
ip2pa1
i1za
2if
if1r
if3l
if2tr2
i1ßu2
i1ö2
i2que
i1q
iqu2
i1xi
i1xe
2s.
3sa.
3sann
s1a2ns
s1an1b
s2and
s1an1w
sa1ik
3sas
sa1sc
sa1sk
1sac
1sah
2sab
sa1d
1sa1la
sa1len
sa1lu
sau1ri1
sau1r
sau2f
1sag
1sat
s1at1m
1sam
sa1pi1
1sa2f
1saß
2s1r
s3ru
1so.
so1ri
2s1ord
so1o
1son
soi2
so1e2
2so1d
so2di
1som
s1n
sni1
1si
si1as
si1al
si1r
s1i2ns
si1sc
si1en
sib1l
sig2n
si1g1ne
sim2p
2s1s2
ss3h
sse3in3f
s1se
sse3g
2sca
2s1ci
2s2ch.
1scho
2schs
2s2ch1h
1sche
2sche2g
2sch1b2
2sch1lic
s2chl
3schu
2sc2ht
1schö
s1ha
s1ho2c
1shop
s1hof
s1hi
s1he
s2hef
s1hä
s1hu
s1hü
s1h1f
s1hö
s3hy
1se
se1a2n
se1au
ser2a
se1raf
ser1ei
s2ere
se1r2em
ser1k
2serz
se1o
sen1sp2
se2ns
se2n1un
2s1ei2n1h
sei3ne
3sein1g
3s2eil
s2es
se2e1i
se1b
s2e2l.
s2e2lo
se1um
se2ke
se3ma
2semp
2sex
se1xi
2s1b
s3ba
s3br
1sä
2s1är
2s1äuß
2säm
2s1d
s3do
sdä1
s1l
su1ra
su1na
s1unt
s1unf
1suc
su1e
1su2b1
s1um1f
2s1g2
1süc
s1üb
sko2o
s1ko
1s2kop
1ski.
s1kin
s1ki2e
s1ke
s1ku
2st.
1staa
1star
1stan
2st1an1w
1stah
1stad2
1staun
st1akt
1stat
1stam
st2r2
2s1trai
3s2tral
st3ros
1strik
2stres
1sto
1sti
2st1s
st1ho
st1hi
s1the
st1hei
1ste
2st1e2s1s2
2st1eur
ste2g3
1stä
2st1l
1stu
2stum
1stü
st1z
1stö
2s1m
smi1s
s1mi
s3mö
2s1w
s1wa1s
swün3
sp2
2s1paa
1span
spani3e
spa1ni
1spal
1spa1z
1spra
sp2r
1spru
2s1pos
s1pol
1s2pi
spi2e
s1ps
1spei
1spü
s1pf
s1z
s2zö1
2s1f
s3fo
1sö
s1ö2k
s1öf
syn1
2c.
ca2c
ca1b
1cam
1cr
1co
co1ri
co1s
co2v
1ci
c1s
c1c
2ch.
1chae
ch1a2bi
ch1ak
chr2
1chow
2chn2
2ch1ia3
chi3er.
2ch1h
ch1ero
ch2e1re
ch1e2b
che2g
ch1e1ge
1chef.
2chl
ch2lu
2chus
ch1üb
2ch2m
ch4mu
1ce1a
ce1nu
cen1g
1cee
ce1le
1cet
cä1
1cl
1cu
ck1an
c1k1r
ck1n
cki1s
ck1l
ck1ur
ck1ta
ckt1h
c1to
c1ti
c1m
2ha.
ha1ra
h1ar1b
ha1os
ha1is
h1ahm
ha1er
ha1be
ha1bl
ha1de2
ha1le
h1altr2
h1au1to
ha2ut
ha1go
hr1ar
h1rand
hr1am
h1rin
h1ric
hri2e
hr2so
hr2su
hr1c
h1re2s
hre1s1e
h1re1d
h1rep
hr1äm
h1ru
h2rub
h1rü
hr1z
ho1ri
ho1no1
ho1s1l
ho2s3p2
ho2c
hoch1
ho1b
hou2
hom2me
hn1ar
h1nam
hn1su
h2ns
hn1c
h2nel
h1ne
hn1är
hn3d
h1nun
h1ia3
hin1a
h1i2m.
hip1h2
h1sa
h2san
